dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
    <pardef n="reg/el__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>lerna</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>larna</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>el</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eln</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ler</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>lar</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gas__n_un">
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="slogan__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sen</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="trim/mer__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>mern</l><r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rar</l><r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mers</l><r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rarna</l><r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mersarna</l><r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mersen</l><r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mer</l><r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="skinhead__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sen</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hag/el__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>el</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>let</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>len</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>el</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rim__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>met</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>men</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tema__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tana</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ta</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lex__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ink/a__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>or</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>orna</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>an</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="st/av__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>aven</l><r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>av</l><r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>äverna</l><r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>avarna</l><r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>äver</l><r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>avar</l><r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="flödesdiagram"><i>flödesdiagram</i><par n="rim__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="trapets"><i>trapets</i><par n="gas__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="gaffelsegel"><i>gaffelseg</i><par n="hag/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="sångtema"><i>sångtema</i><par n="tema__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="trimmer"><i>trim</i><par n="trim/mer__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="tema"><i>tema</i><par n="tema__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="skrapnos"><i>skrapnos</i><par n="lex__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="åttaårscykel"><i>åttaårscyk</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="nyhetstelegram"><i>nyhetstelegram</i><par n="rim__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="monokel"><i>monok</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="genius"><i>genius</i><par n="lex__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="mingel"><i>ming</i><par n="hag/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="stigma"><i>stigma</i><par n="tema__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="stav"><i>st</i><par n="st/av__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="seismogram"><i>seismogram</i><par n="rim__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="årscykel"><i>årscyk</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="riktmedel"><i>riktmed</i><par n="hag/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="klipprum"><i>klipprum</i><par n="rim__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="solarplexus"><i>solarplexus</i><par n="lex__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="lex"><i>lex</i><par n="lex__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gurkha"><i>gurkh</i><par n="ink/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ballongsegel"><i>ballongseg</i><par n="hag/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="valborgsmäss"><i>valborgsmäss</i><par n="lex__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="grästrimmer"><i>grästrim</i><par n="trim/mer__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="sars"><i>sars</i><par n="gas__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="sidotema"><i>sidotema</i><par n="tema__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="hektogram"><i>hektogram</i><par n="rim__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="gödselmedel"><i>gödselmed</i><par n="hag/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="gravis"><i>gravis</i><par n="lex__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="coitus"><i>coitus</i><par n="lex__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gips"><i>gips</i><par n="gas__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="mars"><i>mars</i><par n="lex__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="slogan"><i>slogan</i><par n="slogan__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bruckel"><i>bruck</i><par n="hag/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="väntrum"><i>väntrum</i><par n="rim__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="monoaminoxidas"><i>monoaminoxidas</i><par n="gas__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="sexualcykel"><i>sexualcyk</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kangas"><i>kangas</i><par n="lex__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="missis"><i>missis</i><par n="lex__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bantningsmedel"><i>bantningsmed</i><par n="hag/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="konferensrum"><i>konferensrum</i><par n="rim__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="huvudtema"><i>huvudtema</i><par n="tema__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="binokel"><i>binok</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ranunkel"><i>ranunk</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ormyngel"><i>ormyng</i><par n="hag/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="generalissimus"><i>generalissimus</i><par n="lex__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="vilrum"><i>vilrum</i><par n="rim__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="sherpa"><i>sherp</i><par n="ink/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="sagocykel"><i>sagocyk</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="tomrum"><i>tomrum</i><par n="rim__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="måncykel"><i>måncyk</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="trippel"><i>tripp</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="falafel"><i>falaf</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="vårtmedel"><i>vårtmed</i><par n="hag/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="inka"><i>ink</i><par n="ink/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="dokumentärprogram"><i>dokumentärprogram</i><par n="rim__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="isranunkel"><i>isranunk</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="dekanus"><i>dekanus</i><par n="lex__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="t"><i>t</i><par n="t__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="salighetsmedel"><i>salighetsmed</i><par n="hag/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="menstruationscykel"><i>menstruationscyk</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="undersegel"><i>underseg</i><par n="hag/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="glapprum"><i>glapprum</i><par n="rim__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="paria"><i>pari</i><par n="ink/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gas"><i>gas</i><par n="gas__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="hednatempel"><i>hednatemp</i><par n="hag/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="skinhead"><i>skinhead</i><par n="skinhead__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="rips"><i>rips</i><par n="gas__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="kontrollrum"><i>kontrollrum</i><par n="rim__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="saneringsmedel"><i>saneringsmed</i><par n="hag/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="livscykel"><i>livscyk</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gårdsrum"><i>gårdsrum</i><par n="rim__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="solcykel"><i>solcyk</i><par n="reg/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="nemesis"><i>nemesis</i><par n="lex__n_ut"/></e>
